Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 74.39A.076 and 2024 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning January 7, 2012, except for long-term care workers exempt from certification under RCW 18.88B.041(1)(a):(a) A parent who is the individual provider only for the person's developmentally disabled child, including when related by marriage or domestic partnership, must receive 12 hours of training relevant to the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities within the first 120 days after becoming an individual provider.(b) ((A spouse or registered domestic partner who is a long-term care worker only for a spouse or domestic partner, pursuant to the long-term services and supports trust program established in chapter 50B.04 RCW, must receive 15 hours of basic training, and at least six hours of additional focused training based on the care-receiving spouse's or partner's needs, within the first 120 days after becoming a long-term care worker.(c))) A person working as an individual provider who (i) provides respite care services only for individuals with developmental disabilities receiving services under Title 71A RCW or only for individuals who receive services under this chapter, and (ii) works 300 hours or less in any calendar year, must complete 14 hours of training within the first 120 days after becoming an individual provider. Five of the 14 hours must be completed before becoming eligible to provide care, including two hours of orientation training regarding the caregiving role and terms of employment and three hours of safety training. The training partnership identified in RCW 74.39A.360 must offer at least 12 of the 14 hours online, and five of those online hours must be individually selected from elective courses.(((d)))(c) Individual providers identified in (((d)))(c)(i) or (ii) of this subsection must complete 35 hours of training within the first 120 days after becoming an individual provider. Five of the 35 hours must be completed before becoming eligible to provide care. Two of these five hours shall be devoted to an orientation training regarding an individual provider's role as caregiver and the applicable terms of employment, and three hours shall be devoted to safety training, including basic safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection control. Individual providers subject to this requirement include:(i)(A) Unless covered by (a) of this subsection, an individual provider caring only for the individual provider's child or parent, including when related by marriage or domestic partnership;(B) An individual provider caring only for the individual provider's sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin, niece, nephew, grandparent, or grandchild, including when related by marriage or domestic partnership;(ii) A person working as an individual provider who provides 20 hours or less of care for one person in any calendar month; and(iii) A long-term care worker providing approved services only for a spouse or registered domestic partner and funded through the United States department of veterans affairs home and community-based programs.(2) In computing the time periods in this section, the first day is the date of hire.(3) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The department shall only approve training curriculum that:(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker representatives; and(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.(4) If a pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency impacts the ability of long-term care workers to complete training as required by this section, the department may adopt rules to allow long-term care workers additional time to complete the training requirements.(a) Rules adopted under this subsection (4) are effective until the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency or until the department determines that all long-term care workers who were unable to complete the training required in subsection (1) of this section have had adequate access to complete the required training, whichever is later. Once the department determines a rule adopted under this subsection (4) is no longer necessary, it must repeal the rule under RCW 34.05.353.(b) Within 12 months of the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency, the department shall conduct a review of training compliance with subsection (1) of this section and provide the legislature with a report.(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 2. RCW 18.88B.041 and 2024 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The following long-term care workers are not required to become a certified home care aide pursuant to this chapter:(a)(i)(A) Registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nursing assistants or persons who are in an approved training program for certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW, medicare-certified home health aides, or other persons who hold a similar health credential, as determined by the secretary, or persons with special education training and an endorsement granted by the superintendent of public instruction, as described in RCW 28A.300.010, if the secretary determines that the circumstances do not require certification.(B) A person who was initially hired as a long-term care worker prior to January 7, 2012, and who completes all of the training requirements in effect as of the date the person was hired.(ii) Individuals exempted by (a)(i) of this subsection may obtain certification as a home care aide without fulfilling the training requirements in RCW 74.39A.074(1)(d)(ii) but must successfully complete a certification examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.031.(b) All long-term care workers employed by community residential service businesses.(c)(i) An individual provider caring only for the individual provider's child or parent, including when related by marriage or domestic partnership; and(ii) An individual provider caring only for the individual provider's sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin, niece, nephew, grandparent, or grandchild, including when related by marriage or domestic partnership.(d) A person working as an individual provider who provides 20 hours or less of nonrespite care for one person in any calendar month.(e) A person working as an individual provider who only provides respite services and works less than 300 hours in any calendar year.(f) ((A long-term care worker providing approved services only for a spouse or registered domestic partner, pursuant to the long-term services and supports trust program established in chapter 50B.04 RCW.(g))) A long-term care worker providing approved services only for a spouse or registered domestic partner and funded through the United States department of veterans affairs home and community-based programs.(2) A long-term care worker exempted by this section from the training requirements contained in RCW 74.39A.074 may not be prohibited from enrolling in training pursuant to that section.(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 3. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2024 c 327 s 16 and 2024 c 168 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pollution liability insurance program trust account, the produce railcar pool account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, ((the long-term services and supports trust account,)) the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative treasury trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 4. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2024 c 327 s 17 and 2024 c 168 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the produce railcar pool account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, ((the long-term services and supports trust account,)) the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative treasury trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 5. RCW 44.44.040 and 2022 c 233 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement systems, including all studies required by law.(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the state investment board.(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of retirement systems.(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c) any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of representatives or the senate.(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be requested from time to time.(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under RCW 41.04.276.(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2, Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.(8) Provide actuarial assistance to the committee on advanced tuition payment pursuant to chapter 28B.95 RCW, including recommending a tuition unit price to the committee on advanced tuition payment to be used in the ensuing enrollment period. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state actuary under RCW 39.34.130.(9) ((Provide actuarial assistance to the long-term services and supports trust commission pursuant to chapter 50B.04 RCW. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state actuary under RCW 39.34.130.(10))) Provide actuarial assistance, as requested by the employment security department or the office of financial management, to the employment security department related to the family and medical leave program in Title 50A RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 50B.04.010 (Definitions) and 2024 c 120 s 3, 2021 c 113 s 1, 2020 c 98 s 1, & 2019 c 363 s 2;(2) RCW 50B.04.020 (DutiesâHealth care authority, department of social and health services, office of the state actuary, employment security department) and 2024 c 120 s 4, 2022 c 1 s 1, 2021 c 113 s 2, 2020 c 98 s 2, & 2019 c 363 s 3;(3) RCW 50B.04.030 (Long-term services and supports trust commissionâInvestment strategy subcommittee) and 2022 c 1 s 2, 2021 c 113 s 3, & 2019 c 363 s 4;(4) RCW 50B.04.040 (Long-term services and supports councilâBenefit unit adjustment) and 2019 c 363 s 5;(5) RCW 50B.04.050 (Qualified individuals) and 2024 c 120 s 5;(6) RCW 50B.04.055 (ExemptionsâVoluntary exemptionsâCriteria, rules, and proceduresâDiscontinuingâNotification) and 2022 c 2 s 2;(7) RCW 50B.04.060 (Eligible beneficiariesâDeterminationâServices and benefits) and 2024 c 120 s 6, 2022 c 1 s 4, & 2019 c 363 s 7;(8) RCW 50B.04.070 (Payment of benefits) and 2024 c 120 s 7 & 2019 c 363 s 8;(9) RCW 50B.04.080 (Premium assessmentâRateâCollection) and 2022 c 2 s 1, 2022 c 1 s 5, 2020 c 98 s 4, & 2019 c 363 s 9;(10) RCW 50B.04.085 (Premium assessmentâExemptions) and 2021 c 113 s 5 & 2020 c 98 s 7;(11) RCW 50B.04.088 (Premium assessmentâRefunds for premiums collected prior to July 1, 2023) and 2022 c 1 s 8;(12) RCW 50B.04.090 (Election of coverageâSelf-employed persons) and 2022 c 1 s 6, 2021 c 113 s 6, 2020 c 98 s 5, & 2019 c 363 s 10;(13) RCW 50B.04.095 (Election of coverageâFederally recognized tribe) and 2021 c 113 s 7;(14) RCW 50B.04.100 (Long-term services and supports trust account) and 2024 c 120 s 8 & 2019 c 363 s 11;(15) RCW 50B.04.110 (Long-term services and supports trust accountâInvestmentâPolicies) and 2019 c 363 s 12;(16) RCW 50B.04.120 (Appeal of determinations) and 2020 c 98 s 6 & 2019 c 363 s 13;(17) RCW 50B.04.130 (Medicare data and waiverâReport) and 2019 c 363 s 14;(18) RCW 50B.04.140 (Reports to legislature) and 2022 c 1 s 7 & 2019 c 363 s 15;(19) RCW 50B.04.150 (Benefits not income or resource) and 2019 c 363 s 16;(20) RCW 50B.04.160 (Entitlement not created) and 2019 c 363 s 17;(21) RCW 50B.04.170 (Confidentiality of information and records) and 2022 c 18 s 1;(22) RCW 50B.04.180 (Out-of-state participantsâReportingâCollection of wages) and 2024 c 120 s 2;(23) RCW 50B.04.200 (Prohibition against discrimination) and 2024 c 120 s 9;(24) RCW 50B.04.900 (Findingsâ2019 c 363) and 2019 c 363 s 1; and(25) RCW 43.09.480 (Long-term services and supports trust programâAuditâReport) and 2019 c 363 s 18.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.--- END ---